New York, session 2025-2026, S5914.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 3 of section 503 of the vehicle and traffic 2 law, as amended by chapter 548 of the laws of 1986 and paragraph (i) as 3 amended by chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 4 follows: 5 3. Waiver of fee. (a) The commissioner may waive the payment of fees 6 required by subdivision two of this section if the applicant: 7 (i) is an incarcerated individual in an institution under the juris- 8 diction of a state department or agency, or 9 (ii) is a victim of crime and the driver's license or learner's permit 10 applied for is a replacement for one that was lost or destroyed as a 11 result of the crime. 12 (b) The commissioner shall waive any additional fee associated with 13 the request for an enhanced driver's license if such request is made 14 within thirty days of the issuance or reissuance of a standard driver's 15 license. For purposes of this paragraph, "additional fee" shall mean any 16 fee in excess of the standard fee assessed for such enhanced driver's 17 license. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD09889-01-5